Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.010

Printing and distribution. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

The secretary of state shall, whenever at least one statewide measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election ballot, print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.

The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet, publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any person who requests one.

The secretary of state may make the material required to be distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form. The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast news media, community computer networks, and similar services at the cost of reproduction or transmission of the data.

[ 2003 c 111 s 801. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.81.210.]

PDFRCW 29A.32.010

Printing and distribution. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

The secretary of state shall, whenever at least one statewide measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election ballot, print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.

The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other locations the secretary deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall also produce recorded or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet, publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any person who requests one.

The secretary of state may make the material required to be distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form. The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to web-based, print, and broadcast news media and similar services at the cost of reproduction or transmission of the data.

[ 2024 c 78 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 801. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.81.210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: "This act takes effect January 1, 2025." [ 2024 c 78 s 13.]